Hawaii statutes.
§660-24 Hearing without delay. Upon
the return of the writ or order to show cause, the court shall proceed without
delay to examine the causes of imprisonment or restraint. The examination may
be adjourned from time to time as circumstances may reasonably require. [L
1870, c 32, §17; RL 1925, §2747; RL 1935, §4332; RL 1945, §10373; am L 1953, c
101, §12; RL 1955, §239-24; HRS §660-24; am L 1972, c 90, §5(o)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next